Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.060

Custody and disposition of child absent from school without excuse.

Any school district official, sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, police officer, or any other officer authorized to make arrests, may take into custody without a warrant a child who is required under the provisions of RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140 to attend school and is absent from school without an approved excuse, and shall deliver the child to: (1) The custody of a person in parental relation to the child; (2) the school from which the child is absent; or (3) a program designated by the school district.

[ 1995 c 312 s 73; 1990 c 33 s 223; 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 52; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.27.070. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 366 s 5; RRS s 5076; prior: 1907 c 231 s 5; 1905 c 162 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.27.070, 28.27.070.]

NOTES:

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.